apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="adequa/u__adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>to</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tos</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tas</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>das</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="adequa/u__adj_adv">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>to</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tos</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tas</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>das</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dam</l>       <r>dam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tam</l>       <r>dam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sala/u__adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>to</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tos</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tas</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>das</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dismas</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>disma</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>dismos</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>dismo</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tismas</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>tisma</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>tismos</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>tismo</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sala/u__adj_adv">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>to</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tos</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tas</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>das</l>       <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dismas</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>disma</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>dismos</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>dismo</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tismas</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>tisma</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>tismos</l>    <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>tismo</l>     <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dam</l>       <r>dam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tam</l>       <r>dam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>
     
<pardef n="chic/ot__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ota</l>       <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otz</l>       <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ote</l>       <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ots</l>       <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oz</l>        <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otas</l>      <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="chiqu/et__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eta</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etz</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ets</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ez</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>és</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ers</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etas</l>      <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="chiqu/et__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eta</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etz</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ets</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ez</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>és</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ers</l>       <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etas</l>      <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etam</l>       <r>etam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="negr/ut__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ut</l>        <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uta</l>       <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utz</l>       <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uts</l>       <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uz</l>        <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utas</l>      <r>ut<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="clo/t__n">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tz</l>        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ts</l>        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>z</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="afamau">          <i>afama</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="afortunau">       <i>afortuna</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="africau">         <i>africa</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aplicau">         <i>aplica</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aproximau">       <i>aproxima</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bienplegau">      <i>bienplega</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="chicot">          <i>chic</i><par n="chic/ot__adj"/></e>
<e lm="chiquet">         <i>chiqu</i><par n="chiqu/et__adj_adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="celebrau"> <p><l>cilebra</l>   <r>celebra</r></p><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="complicau">       <i>complica</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="decidiu">         <i>decidi</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="escaixalau"><p><l>descaixala</l><r>escaixala</r></p><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="descarau">        <i>descara</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="esdentegau"><p><l>desdentega</l><r>esdentega</r></p><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desinteresau"><p><l>desintresa</l><r>desinteresa</r></p><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="masiau">   <p><l>desmasia</l>  <r>masia</r></p><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dilatau">         <i>dilata</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="encaragolau">     <i>encaragola</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="esdentau">        <i>esdenta</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="esdentau"> <p><l>esdienta</l>  <r>esdenta</r></p><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="especializau">    <i>especializa</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="interesau">       <i>interesa</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="negrut"><i>negr</i><par n="negr/ut__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nublau">          <i>nubla</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="poliu">           <i>poli</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="reiterau">        <i>reitera</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rizau">           <i>riza</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="separau">         <i>separa</i><par n="sala/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="torciu">          <i>torci</i><par n="adequa/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="zarrau">          <i>zarra</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="antiquau">        <i>antiqua</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="coloriu">         <i>colori</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="complicau">       <i>complica</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="descabellau">     <i>descabella</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desilusionau"><p><l>desilusiona</l><r>desilusiona</r></p><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="desproporcionau"> <i>desproporciona</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="discriminau">     <i>discrimina</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="encertau">        <i>encerta</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="erosionau">       <i>erosiona</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="folgau">          <i>folga</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="incontestau">     <i>incontesta</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="introvertiu">     <i>introverti</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="malgastau">       <i>malgasta</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="prenyau">         <i>prenya</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="separau" c="no sé si hauriem d\'incloure aquestes formes en el paradigma dels participis"><i>separa</i><par n="sala/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="enradigau"><i>enradiga</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="desplegau"><i>desplega</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="invariau"><i>invaria</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="calculau"><i>calcula</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="amuntonau"><i>amuntona</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="desairau"><i>desaira</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="acatau"><i>acata</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="olivau"><i>oliva</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="finchiu"><i>finchi</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="encareixiu"><i>encareixi</i><par n="adequa/u__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="clot">            <par n="/cl_cll__var"/><i>o</i><par n="clo/t__n"/></e>
